Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-484.01
Digital system authorized.

It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the Department of Motor Vehicles to begin issuing operators' licenses and state identification cards using digital images and digital signatures and to allow for electronic renewal of certain operators' licenses and state identification cards. The department shall implement such a digital system.

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 1, § 2.